District of Columbia statutes.
6-1505

Application.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as creating in any person, corporation, unincorporated association, partnership, or other entity any right or entitlement to the tax and other development incentives established by this chapter.

History

Oct. 20, 1988, D.C. Law 7-177, § 12, 35 DCR 6158

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-1405.